New York, session 2025-2026, A9523.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The real property law is amended by adding a new article 2 9-F to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 9-F 4 CENTRAL AIR CONDITIONER AND HEAT PUMP RIGHTS ACT 5 Section 344-o. Certain covenants, conditions, and restrictions of home- 6 owners' associations prohibited. 7 § 344-o. Certain covenants, conditions, and restrictions of homeown- 8 ers' associations prohibited. 1. For the purposes of this section: 9 (a) "restriction on use" shall mean any covenant, restriction, or 10 condition contained in: 11 (i) a deed; 12 (ii) a contract; 13 (iii) the by-laws of a homeowners' association; 14 (iv) any rules or regulations adopted by a homeowners' association; 15 (v) a security agreement; or 16 (vi) any other instrument affecting the transfer or sale of, or any 17 interest in, real property. 18 (b) "central air conditioner" shall mean a type of heating, venti- 19 lation and air conditioning system that is designed to cool an entire 20 home or building, cools air in a central location and distributes it 21 through a network of ducts and vents. 22 (c) "heat pump" shall mean a device that transfers heat from one place 23 to another, using electricity, and can provide both heating and cooling. 24 2. A homeowners' association may not adopt or enforce any rules or 25 regulations that would effectively prohibit, or impose unreasonable 26 limitations on, the installation or use of a central air conditioner or 27 heat pump. A restriction on use which effectively prohibits the instal- 28 lation or use of a central air conditioner or heat pump is unenforceable EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11375-03-6 A. 9523 2 1 and shall be void as contrary to public policy. For the purposes of this 2 subdivision, an unreasonable limitation includes, but is not limited to, 3 any restriction on use that: 4 (a) inhibits the central air conditioner or heat pump from functioning 5 at its intended maximum efficiency; or 6 (b) increases the central air conditioner or heat pump's installation 7 or maintenance costs by an amount which is estimated to be greater than 8 ten percent of the total cost of the initial installation of the central 9 air conditioner or heat pump, including the costs of labor and equip- 10 ment. 11 3. Notwithstanding subdivision two of this section, a homeowners' 12 association may adopt or enforce a restriction on use to prohibit the 13 installation of a central air conditioner or heat pump that is located 14 on property owned by the homeowners' association or that is located on 15 property owned in common by the members of the homeowners' association. 16 4. If approval for the installation or use of a central air condition- 17 er or heat pump is required by a homeowners' association, the applica- 18 tion for approval shall be processed and approved by the association in 19 a manner prescribed by the association and shall not be willfully 20 avoided or delayed. The approval or denial of an application shall be in 21 writing. Any denial of a homeowner's application shall include a 22 detailed description of the exact basis for the denial and shall include 23 specific examples of the homeowners' association's concerns, if applica- 24 ble. If an application is not denied in writing within sixty days from 25 the date of receipt of the application, the application shall be deemed 26 approved, unless that delay is the result of a reasonable request for 27 additional information. 28 5. A central air conditioner or heat pump shall meet the requirements 29 established by any local, state or federal law, rule or regulation on 30 health and safety standards and those requirements imposed by state and 31 local permitting authorities. 32 6. In any action by a homeowner requesting to have a central air 33 conditioner or heat pump installed and seeking to enforce compliance 34 with this section, the homeowner shall be awarded reasonable attorney's 35 fees if such homeowner prevails. 36 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 37 have become a law.